Wisconsin, session 2025, AB646.
do enact as follows:AB646,11Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB646,2,22(1) School district consolidation study. AB646,2,43(a) In this subsection, “department” means the department of public 4instruction.AB646,2,85(b) By the 1st day of the 4th month beginning after the effective date of this 6paragraph, the department shall award a contract, using a competitive request for 7proposal process, to an entity to study all of the following related to school districts 8in this state:AB646,2,991. School district and municipal boundaries.AB646,2,10102. Geographic barriers to consolidation.AB646,2,11113. The location, capacity, and condition of existing school facilities.AB646,2,13124. Population distribution across the state, including the population of school-13age children residing in each school district.AB646,2,14145. Staffing levels and salary scales.AB646,2,15156. Debts, liabilities, and assets of school districts.AB646,2,16167. Pupil demographics.AB646,2,17178. Revenue limits and current overall spending.AB646,2,18189. Property tax levy and mill rates.AB646,2,191910. Pupil transportation.AB646,3,220(c) The department shall require the entity awarded the contract under par. 21(b) to submit, by the first day of the 10th month beginning after the effective date of 1this paragraph, a report to the department that includes at least all of the 2following:AB646,3,331. Recommendations for improvements to school district boundaries.AB646,3,542. The conditions of school district facilities in each school district in this 5state.AB646,3,863. The population of school-age children in each school district in the current 7school year and a projection of the population of school-age children in each school 8district in 10 years.AB646,3,1194. Recommendations for school district consolidations that promote efficiency 10and are geographically feasible and economically viable and, for each recommended 11school district consolidation, all of the following:AB646,3,1212a. The estimated pupil enrollment of the consolidated school district.AB646,3,1413b. The cities, villages, or towns that are located in whole or in part within the 14consolidated school district boundaries.AB646,3,1615c. The location of and grade levels served by each existing public school 16building located in the consolidated school district.AB646,3,1717d. The property values in the consolidated school district.AB646,3,2018(d) The department shall submit the report it receives under par. (c) to the 19joint committee on finance and to the appropriate standing committees of the 20legislature in the manner provided under s. 13.172 (3).AB646,4,221(2) Funding request. By no later than July 1, 2026, the department of public 22instruction shall submit a request to the joint committee on finance to supplement 23the department’s appropriation under s. 20.255 (1) (a) from the joint finance 1committee supplemental appropriation under s. 20.865 (4) (a) with an amount 2necessary for the department to accomplish the duties under sub. (1).AB646,4,33